Utah statutes.
59-1-1101.   Private collection of tax -- Fee.
(1)  The tax commission is authorized to employ private collectors for the
collection of accounts that are unpaid over 12 months after the assessment
date.
(2) Up to, but no more than, 33% of the money collected may be used to offset
the payment to a private collector.
